DIAGNOSTICS -

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI-291

DIARO-01

DTC

C 1257 / 57

Power Supply Drive Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

C1257/57

When malfunctioninside ECU is detected.

* Battery
e Power source circuit
« Skid control ECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

Engine Room J/B
1 AM2 9 Skid Control ECU
B-G 1C 1B )
126 Ignition SW
_ _ W-R
J14 LB 1GT Sy AMT B-R Cowl Side J/B LH
I
= B-R 1G2 f\=cAM2 W-R | 10
AL_JA 6__° 7 2E 2A
B-R
Cowl Side J/B LH _
1G1 No. 2 Rel Cowl Side J/B RH
Shalid 37 22 IGN 4
T "2 = 3B 3E
ECU-IG1 18
2B}
B A i G 6
B-R yon,
3@ o
B-W (A31) 1G1
B-G W_B 7
1 |JBNo.2 ALT FL Block (A29) GND4
FSSW—W—I 3 7 |w-B ]
2 MAIN ).@ 3B) (A29)GND3
& o— I 18 2| wg .2
L (A37) GND1
Q? Battery | | e
T )< Cowl Side W-B
EE(1) | IF(1)|  JBLH(1)RH(2) GND2
1 *1: LHD EB(*2) | 1I(*2)
N = *2: RHD = = =
F17710

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP

(RM970E)



DI-292 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbattery voltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

NG> Check and repair the charging system.

@

2 | Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

Incaseofusingthehand -heldtester.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe voltage condition output from the ECU displayed onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

Incaseofnotusingthehand -heldtester:

ON PREPARATION:
@ GND2 Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
GND1 ( 1G1GND3 Y | CHECK:
”EID 000 0O O8000 OS l:ll:l ooat |||41(5:| oooal (a) Turn the |gn|t|0n SWItCh ON
0N, [eiaiaaiaeeliaiial'2r-\ st aaissfi i aoisa i (b) Measure voltage between terminals IG1 and GND of skid
W VV control ECU connector.
GND4 OK:
: ) ¢ Voltage: 10 - 14V

F09165
OK Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace
skid control ECU.
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3 | Check continuity between terminal GND of skid control ECU connector and body
ground.

CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal GND of skid control ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 1 Q or less

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

4 Check ECU-IG fuse.

PREPARATION:

Remove ECU-IG fuse from the cowl side J/B LH.
CHECK:

Check continuity of ECU-IG fuse.

OK:

tion)| L Continuity
100000000 l /
00000080

74

Cowl Side J/B LH:

F04448

components connected to ECU-IG fuse (See at-
tached wiring diagram).

NG> Check for short circuit in all the harness and

@

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between skid control ECU and battery (See page
IN-38).
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